Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,239.09
Risk Management Administration Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Risk Management Administration Cash Fund. The fund shall be administered by the Risk Manager. The fund shall consist of miscellaneous fees for services provided by the Risk Manager and shall be used to pay for expenses of the risk management and state claims program.

Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1211, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 113.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.